Hawaii statutes.
§304A-2153 University of Hawaii tuition and
fees special fund. (a) There is established the University of Hawaii
tuition and fees special fund into which shall be deposited all revenue
collected by the university for regular, summer, and continuing education
credit tuition, tuition-related course and fee charges, and any other charges
to students, except as provided by law. Moneys deposited into the fund shall
be expended to maintain or improve the university's programs and operations and
shall not be:

(1) Used as a justification for reducing any budget
request or allotment to the university unless the university requests such a
reduction;

(2) Transferred unless otherwise authorized by the
legislature; and

(3) Restricted by the governor or the director of
finance without the prior approval of the legislature.

Any rule, policy, or action of any agency or
individual in contravention of this subsection shall be void as against public
policy.

(b) Any law to the contrary notwithstanding,
the board of regents may authorize expenditures of up to $3,000,000 annually,
excluding in-kind services, from this fund for the purposes of promoting alumni
relations and generating private donations for deposit into the University of
Hawaii Foundation for the purposes of the university. Any expenditure
authorized pursuant to this subsection shall be for a public purpose and shall
not be subject to chapters 42F, 103, 103D, and 103F. The university shall
submit a comprehensive report to the legislature detailing the use of any funds
authorized by the board under this subsection no later than twenty days prior
to the convening of each regular session.

The report shall:

(1) Identify each department of the University of
Hawaii Foundation supported by moneys from the fund;

(2) Describe the purposes and activities of each
department identified in paragraph (1) and how it participates in fundraising
activities and benefits the university;

(3) Provide the total expenditures of each department
identified in paragraph (1) by primary expense categories;

(4) Identify all moneys from the fund transferred to
any fund of the university and provide a justification of how these moneys are
used to benefit the university;

(5) Provide a financial summary of the operating
activities of the University of Hawaii Foundation, including revenues and
expenditures by major reporting categories; and

(6) Identify amounts and purposes of all expenditures
from the University of Hawaii support fund.

(c) Any law to the contrary notwithstanding,
the university may transfer funds from the University of Hawaii tuition and
fees special fund into the scholarship and assistance special fund established
pursuant to section 304A-2159.

(d) In estimating its quarterly budget
requirements, each campus of the University of Hawaii shall prepare a plan for
the fiscal year for the operation of each of the programs that it is
responsible for administering. The operations plan shall be:

(1) In such form and content as the vice president
for budget and finance and chief financial officer of the University of Hawaii
may prescribe; and

(2) Submitted, together with the estimated quarterly
budget requirements, to the vice president for budget and finance and chief
financial officer on such date as the vice president for budget and finance and
chief financial officer may prescribe.

(e) The president and vice president for
budget and finance and chief financial officer of the University of Hawaii:

(1) Shall review the operations plan for each campus
to determine if:

(A) It is consistent with the policy
decisions of the board of regents and appropriations by the legislature;

(B) It reflects proper planning and efficient
management methods; and

(C) Appropriations have been made for the
planned purpose and will not be exhausted before the end of the fiscal year;

(2) Shall approve the operations plan for each campus
if they determine that the operations plan meets the requirements of paragraph
(1); and

(3) May modify or withhold the planned expenditures
of any campus at any time during the appropriations period.

(f) At the end of each fiscal year, the moneys
in the University of Hawaii tuition and fees special fund for each campus shall
lapse to the credit of program identification number UOH900 (University of Hawaii,
system wide support). [L 2006, c 75, pt of §2; am L 2015, c 236, §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next